apertium-mwl.mwl.twol
Alphabet
 A Á B C Ç D E É Ê F G H I Í J K L M N O Ó Ô P Q R S T Ú Ũ Ü W X Y Z
 a á b c ç d e é ê f g h i í j k l m n o ó ô p q r s t u ú ũ w x y z
 %{A%}:a %>:0  
 %{e%}:0 %{e%}:e 
 %{Ç%}:ç %{Ç%}:z
 %{O%}:o %{O%}:a
 %{subj%}:0 %:>0
 %{accent%}:́  %{accent%}:0
 %{ps%}:s %:>0
 ;

Sets

Vowel = A Á E É Ê I Í O Ó Ô U Ú Ũ 
        a á e é ê i í o ó ô u ú ũ ;

Consonant = B C Ç D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Y Z
            b c ç d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z ;

Rules

"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending stem"
i:0 <=> Vow %{VSUF%}:0 _ [ m | n ] ;

"Realize accent"
 %{accent%}:́  <=> Vowel _ r %{subj%}: ;

"realise {e} as e after morpheme-final consonant and before plural suffix"
%{e%}:e <=> :Consonant %>: _ s .#. ;

"realise ç as ç before word boundary"
%{Ç%}:ç <=> _ .#. ;

! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
